District of Columbia statutes.
24-201.07

Jail and Washington Asylum combined.

The Jail of the District of Columbia and the Washington Asylum of said District shall be combined as 1 institution, known as the Washington Asylum and Jail.

Mar. 2, 1911, 36 Stat. 1003, ch. 192
1981 Ed., § 24-407.
1973 Ed., § 24-407.